Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4829.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.1611, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Distributed generation capacity; treatment. new text end new text begin (a) No later than November 1, 2026, the commission must issue an order clarifying that for purposes of interconnecting an on-site customer-owned distributed generation facility, the capacity of the facility must be measured and expressed as: new text end new text begin (1) export capacity rather than nameplate capacity; and new text end new text begin (2) alternating current capacity. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "export capacity" means a distributed generation facility's nameplate capacity net of any limitations on the amount of power the distributed generating facility is capable of exporting to a utility's distribution system resulting from physical equipment that is part of or connected to the generating facility, including but not limited to an inverter, relay, or energy storage system, as defined in section 216B.2422, subdivision 1, paragraph (f), as reported to the utility by the owner of the distributed generation facility. new text end new text begin (c) The owner of a distributed generation facility interconnected to a utility's distribution system is prohibited from increasing the export capacity of the distributed generation facility beyond the level that was first interconnected to the utility's distribution system unless the utility provides written approval. The utility must respond in writing to an owner's notice of intent to increase export capacity within 90 days of the date the notice is received and may reject the request only upon determining that approving the request reduces safety or the reliability of electric service. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [216B.1616] FEEDER LINE REPLACEMENT; STORAGE REQUIREMENT. new text end new text begin (a) When replacing a feeder line with a feeder line with a higher capacity, a public utility must install at the applicable distribution substation an energy storage system that has sufficient capacity to ensure customer safety and grid reliability. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section: new text end new text begin (1) "energy storage system" has the meaning given in section 216B.2422, subdivision 1, paragraph (f); and new text end new text begin (2) "feeder line" means a powerline (i) that transfers power from a distribution system substation to distribution transformers, and (ii) whose current flow is the same at the sending and receiving ends of the powerline. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [216B.1617] ENERGY STORAGE; DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE TARIFF. new text end new text begin (a) No later than September 15, 2026, the commission must initiate a docket designed to result in a commission order requiring public utilities providing electric service to file a distributed energy resource tariff with the commission, based on guidelines established in the order, to compensate customer-owners of on-site distributed energy resources for the discharge of generated or stored energy that is net input to the public utility. The tariff must account for all value provided by distributed energy resources, including but not limited to energy, capacity, ancillary services, demand response, temporal value, locational value, and environmental value. new text end new text begin (b) Within 90 days of the date the commission issues an order under this subdivision, a public utility must file with the commission for commission approval, disapproval, or modification a tariff that is consistent with the order. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of this section, "distributed energy resource" means a resource, located at a public utility customer's site, with a generation capacity no greater than ten megawatts. Distributed energy resource includes an energy storage system, as defined in section 216B.2422, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [216B.1697] ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS; DEPLOYMENT TARGETS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "energy storage system" has the meaning given in section 216B.2422, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Deployment targets. new text end new text begin (a) A utility required to file a resource plan under section 216B.2422 must deploy energy storage systems with a capacity determined by the commission under paragraph (b). No later than December 31, 2036, the aggregate statewide capacity of energy storage systems deployed by all utilities subject to this section must be at least 3,000 megawatts. new text end new text begin (b) No later than October 1, 2026, the commission must issue an order specifying the amount of energy storage capacity required of each utility subject to this section to meet the statewide capacity target and schedule in paragraph (a). The amount of energy storage capacity required of an individual utility must be calculated by dividing the utility's total electric retail sales to Minnesota customers in 2025 by the total electric retail sales to Minnesota customers in 2025 of all utilities subject to this section, and multiplying the resulting quotient by 3,000 megawatts. The commission may establish interim energy storage capacity targets that utilities are required to meet before the 2036 target date. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin (a) A utility must file an application with the commission before installing a proposed energy storage system. The application must contain: new text end new text begin (1) the energy storage system's technical specifications, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (i) the maximum amount of electric output the energy storage system is capable of providing; new text end new text begin (ii) the length of time the energy storage system is capable of sustaining maximum output; new text end new text begin (iii) the location of the project within the utility's distribution system and a description of the analysis conducted to determine the location; new text end new text begin (iv) a description of the utility's electric system needs the proposed energy storage system addresses; new text end new text begin (v) a description of the services the energy storage system is expected to provide; and new text end new text begin (vi) a description of the technology required to construct, operate, and maintain the energy storage system, including a data or communication system necessary to operate the energy storage system; new text end new text begin (2) the estimated cost of the project, including: new text end new text begin (i) capital costs; new text end new text begin (ii) the estimated cost per unit of energy delivered by the energy storage system; and new text end new text begin (iii) an evaluation of the energy storage system's cost-effectiveness; new text end new text begin (3) the energy storage system's estimated benefits to the utility's electric system, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (i) deferred investments in generation, transmission, or distribution capacity; new text end new text begin (ii) reduced need for electricity during times of peak demand; new text end new text begin (iii) improved reliability of the utility's transmission or distribution system; and new text end new text begin (iv) improved integration of the utility's renewable energy resources; new text end new text begin (4) a description indicating how the addition of an energy storage system complements the utility's proposed actions described in the most recent integrated resource plan submitted under section 216B.2422 to meet expected demand with the least expensive combination of resources; and new text end new text begin (5) any additional information required by the commission. new text end new text begin (b) A utility must include in the application an evaluation of the potential to store energy throughout the utility's electric system and must identify geographic areas in the utility's service area where the deployment of energy storage systems has the greatest potential to achieve the economic benefits identified in paragraph (a), clause (3). new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Commission review. new text end new text begin The commission must review each proposal submitted under this section and may approve, reject, or modify the proposal. The commission must approve a proposal the commission determines: (1) is in the public interest; and (2) reasonably balances the value derived from the deployment of an energy storage system for ratepayers and the utility's operations with the cost to procure, construct, operate, and maintain the energy storage system. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Cost recovery. new text end new text begin A public utility may recover from ratepayers all costs prudently incurred by the public utility to deploy an energy storage system approved by the commission under this section, net of any revenues generated by the operation of the energy storage system. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Reporting; compliance. new text end new text begin The commission must establish reporting procedures for utilities that are sufficient in content and frequency to ensure the commission is informed regarding compliance with this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Commission authority; orders. new text end new text begin The commission may issue orders and conduct proceedings necessary to implement and administer this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.2422, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Energy storage systems assessment. (a) Each deleted text begin publicdeleted text end utility required to file a resource plan under subdivision 2 must new text begin incorporate in the utility's resource planning the energy storage targets the utility is required to meet under section 216B.1697 and must new text end include in the filing an assessment of energy storage systems that analyzes how the deployment of energy storage systems contributes to: (1) meeting identified generation and capacity needs; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (2) the factors identified under section 216B.1697, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (3); and new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end evaluating ancillary services. (b) The assessment must employ appropriate modeling methods to enable the analysis required in paragraph (a). Sec. 6. new text begin [216C.3771] ENERGY STORAGE INCENTIVE PROGRAM. new text end new text begin (a) The public utility subject to section 116C.779 must develop and operate a program that provides grants to customers to reduce the cost to purchase and install an on-site energy storage system, as defined in section 216B.2422, subdivision 1, paragraph (f). No later than November 1, 2026, the public utility subject to this section must file a plan with the commissioner to operate the program. The public utility must not operate the program until the plan is approved by the commissioner. A change to an operating program must be approved by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) To be eligible to receive a grant under this section, a customer's energy storage system must: new text end new text begin (1) have a capacity no greater than 50 kilowatt-hours; and new text end new text begin (2) be located within the electric service area of the public utility subject to this section. new text end new text begin (c) An owner of an energy storage system is eligible to receive a grant under this section if: new text end new text begin (1) a solar energy generating system is operating at the same site as the proposed energy storage system; or new text end new text begin (2) the owner has filed an application with the public utility subject to this section to interconnect a solar energy generating system at the same site as the proposed energy storage system. new text end new text begin (d) The amount of a grant awarded under this section must be based on the number of watt-hours that reflects the duration of the energy storage system at the system's rated capacity, up to a maximum of $........ new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner must annually review and may adjust the amount of grants awarded under this section, but the commissioner must not increase the amount above the amount awarded in previous years unless the commissioner demonstrates in writing that an upward adjustment is warranted due to market conditions. new text end new text begin (f) A customer who receives a grant under this section is eligible to receive financial assistance under programs operated by the state or the utility for the solar energy generating system operating in conjunction with the energy storage system. new text end new text begin (g) For purposes of this section, "solar energy generating system" means a set of devices whose primary purpose is to produce electricity by means of any combination of collecting, transferring, or converting solar-generated energy. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the renewable development account established in Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, to the commissioner of commerce to award grants to install energy storage systems under Minnesota Statutes, section 216C.3771, and to pay the reasonable costs incurred by the department to administer Minnesota Statutes, section 216C.3771. This appropriation is available until expended. The base for this appropriation in fiscal year 2028 is $........ new text end